District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Rodent Abatement and Transparency (RAT) Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Subtitle B of the Rodent Control Act of 2000, effective February 2, 2001 (D.C.
Law 13-172; D.C. Official Code § 2103.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Sec. 904 (D.C. Official Code § 8–2103.01) is amended to add a new paragraph (7) to
read as follows:


“(7) “Dashboard” means a publicly accessible, regularly updated online data
interface that is:
“(A) Machine-readable;
“(B) Enabled for source-data export;
“(C) Maintained with time-series and geospatial data; and
“(D) Capable of filtering data by attributes through a graphical user
interface;”.
(b) Sec. 907 (D.C. Official Code § 8–2103.04) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended to strike the phrase “certain health hazards that
have resulted from the harborage of rodents” and insert in its place the phrase “violations of this
subtitle”.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) If the District incurs costs for undertaking any corrective or enforcement action to
abate rodent infestation, rodent harborage, or rodent food sources, all parties found to be liable
by the Mayor shall be jointly and severally liable to the District government for the costs
incurred by the District. In addition to any other enforcement action, the Mayor may assess any
reasonable costs, to total no more than three times the costs incurred by the District, for
correcting the condition and any related expenses as a tax against the property, carry the tax on
the regular tax rolls, and collect the tax in the same manner as real estate taxes are collected.”.
(c) Sec. 908(a) (D.C. Official Code § 8–2103.05(a)) is amended as follows:
“(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to provide harborage to rodents on private
property which they own, or cause or permit the accumulation of debris on public or private


property, or cause or permit weeds or grass to grow to a height of 8 inches or more on private
property which they own.”.
(d) A new section 908b is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 908b. Rodent Abatement Dashboard.
“(a) By January 1, 2027, the Department shall create a dashboard on rodent abatement
metrics and data, which shall be prominently accessible from the Department’s Rodent and
Vector Control Division webpage. The dashboard shall include the following:
“(1) Latest estimate of the District’s rodent population, including the date the
estimate was calculated;
“(2) Time series geospatial data of types of rodent abatement treatments utilized;
“(3) Time series geospatial data of rodent abatement treatment requests and
resolution status; and
“(4) Filters to enable users to view data by Ward, Advisory Neighborhood
Commission, Single Member District, and calendar quarter.”.
(c) A new section 908c is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 908c. Rodent Abatement Report.
“(a) By March 30, 2027, the Department shall submit a report to the Council detailing the
Department’s rodent abatement efforts over the previous three years and their outcomes, and
recommendations for further reducing the rodent population. At minimum, the report shall
include:
“(1) An overview of the current and planned rodent abatement measures,
including goals and specific benchmarks and timelines;


“(2) Metrics the Department is using to measure the efficacy of rodent abatement,
including a description of whether the Department has seen improvement, as measured by such
metrics, and, if so, how such improvement has been achieved;
“(3) Metrics on rodent population during the reporting period;
“(4) Metrics on the number of Notices to Abate Violation issued and corrective
measures undertaken on behalf of property owners;
“(5) A description of public education and outreach measures undertaken by the
Department in relation to rodent abatement; and
“(6) Budgetary recommendations needed to achieve a 20 percent decrease in
rodent population over 3 years.”.
Sec. 3: Subtitle A of Title I of the Sustainable Solid Waste Management Amendment Act
of 2014, effective Feb. 26, 2015 (D.C. Law 20-154; D.C. Official Code § 8–1031.01 et seq.) is
amended as follows:
(a) A new section 106c is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 106c. Removal of public litter containers.
100 “(a) Before removing a public litter container on a block in a Residential Zone, DPW
101 must:
102 “(1) Receive a request for removal;
103 “(2) Issue a written notice of intent to install a public litter container to the
104 Council and the affected Advisory Neighborhood Commissions (“ANC”) and provide the
105 Council and affected ANCs 30 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, to
106 respond; and


107 “(3) Give great weight to any comment from an affected ANC, pursuant to section
108 13(3)(A) of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975 (D.C. Law 1-21; D.C.
109 Official Code§ 1-309.10(3)(A)).”.
110 (b) Section 114 is amended to add a new subsection (c-1) to read as follows:
111 “(c-1) If during the course of enforcement as provided in subsection (c) of this section
112 there is evidence of active rodent or other vector activity, DPW shall also refer the violations to
113 the Department of Health as set forth in sections 907 and 908 of the Rodent Control Act of 2000,
114 effective February 2, 2001 (D.C. Law 13-172; D.C. Official Code § 2103.04 et seq.)
115 and section 6 of the Vector-Borne Infectious Diseases Control Act of 2004, effective May 18,
116 2004 (D.C. Law 15-163; D.C. Official Code § 8–2131.05).”.
117 Sec. 4. Section 8 of the Vector-Borne Infectious Diseases Control Act of 2004, effective
118 May 18, 2004 (D.C. Law 15-163; D.C. Official Code § 8–2131.07) is repealed.
119 Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
120 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
121 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
122 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
123 Sec. 6. Effective date.
124 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
125 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
126 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
127 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).